Illinois, session 104th, HB568.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Charitable Games Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 30/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1121)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known as the the "Charitable 8Games Act". 9(Source: P.A. 84-1303.)